Maryland, session 2026, HB1631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
14–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant,
including all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers,
whether growing or not, with a delta–9–tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does not
exceed 0.3% on a dry weight basis.
(2) “Hemp” does not include any plant or part of a plant intended for a use
that is regulated under [Title 13, Subtitle 33 of the Health – General Article] DIVISION
III OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
(d) “Hemp product” means a product derived from hemp produced in accordance
with Subtitle 3 of this title.
(e) “Independent testing laboratory” has the meaning stated in [§ 13–3301 of the
Health – General Article] § 36–101 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS
ARTICLE.
14–301.
(A) In this subtitle[,] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CERTIFICATE OF ANALYSIS” MEANS A DOCUMENT ISSUED BY AN
INDEPENDENT TESTING LABORATORY THAT CONFIRMS A PRODUCT MEETS ITS
SPECIFIC REGULATORY, SAFETY, AND QUALITY STANDARDS.
(C) “FULL–SPECTRUM HEMP OIL” MEANS A HEMP–DERIVED EXTRACT
INTENDED FOR USE BY A HUMAN OR ANIMAL THAT:
(1) IS PRODUCED FROM HEMP, INCLUDING HEMP FLOWER; AND
(2) CONTAINS ONLY NATURALLY OCCURRING CANNABINOIDS AND
TERPENES.
(D) “IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT” MEANS ANY INTERMEDIATE MATERIAL,
DISTILLATE, CRUDE OIL, RESIN, CONCENTRATE, OR OTHER SUBSTANCE THAT IS:

HOUSE BILL 1631 3
(1) DERIVED SOLELY FROM HEMP; AND
(2) GENERATED DURING THE LAWFUL EXTRACTION, REFINEMENT,
FORMULATION, OR MANUFACTURING OF HEMP.
(E) “Program” means the Hemp Farming Program.
(F) “TOTAL THC” MEANS TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLIC ACID (THCA),
MULTIPLIED BY 0.877, PLUS DELTA–9 TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL (THC).
14–306.
(a) The Department shall establish a procedure for licensing [the]:
(1) THE production of hemp in accordance with the plan established under
§ 14–305 of this subtitle; AND
(2) THE MANUFACTURING OF HEMP UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Department may set reasonable fees for the issuance and renewal of
licenses and other services the Department provides under this subtitle.
(c) The Department shall pay all funds collected under this section into the Fund.
14–307.
The Department shall [adopt]:
(1) ADOPT regulations to carry out this subtitle, INCLUDING:
(I) A FIELD VERIFICATION PROTOCOL UNDER § 14–308.5 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) REGULATIONS PROHIBITING THE COMMINGLING OF HEMP
MANUFACTURING AND CANNABIS MANUFACTURING, EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY
AUTHORIZED BY LAW;
(III) THC–CONTENT METRICS FOR FINISHED PRODUCTS THAT:
1. SHALL INCLUDE:
A. A TOTAL–THC METRIC; AND

HOUSE BILL 1631
B. UNIT–BASED LIMITS, EXPRESSED AS PER SERVING
AND PER PACKAGE, AS NECESSARY TO CLEARLY DISTINGUISH HEMP RETAIL
PRODUCTS FROM CANNABIS PRODUCTS DISTRIBUTED THROUGH LICENSED
DISPENSARIES; AND
2. MAY INCLUDE A METRIC FOR:
A. DELTA–9 THC;
B. OTHER INTOXICATING TETRAHYDROCANNABINOLS;
AND
C. ISOMERS; AND
(IV) A CHAIN OF CUSTODY PROTOCOL UNDER § 14–308.3 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) AS NEEDED, UPDATE REGULATIONS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE
WITH FEDERAL LAW.
14–308.
(a) This section does not apply to an institution of higher education or a person
that produces hemp under the Hemp Research Pilot Program in accordance with Subtitle
2 of this title.
(b) A person may not produce hemp in the State unless the person is licensed by:
(1) The Department; or
(2) The Secretary of the U.S. Department of Agriculture.
14–308.1.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A HEMP MANUFACTURING
LICENSE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT ENGAGE IN HEMP MANUFACTURING IN THE STATE
UNLESS THE PERSON IS LICENSED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, A HEMP
MANUFACTURING LICENSE AUTHORIZES A LICENSEE TO:

HOUSE BILL 1631 5
(1) RECEIVE HEMP, INCLUDING HEMP FLOWER, FROM A LICENSED
HEMP GROWER OR OTHER LAWFUL SOURCE;
(2) EXTRACT AND PROCESS HEMP INTO IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT
AND FINISHED HEMP–DERIVED PRODUCTS;
(3) POSSESS, STORE, AND TRANSPORT HEMP, IN–PROCESS HEMP
EXTRACT, AND HEMP PRODUCTS; AND
(4) SELL OR DISTRIBUTE FINISHED HEMP–DERIVED PRODUCTS.
14–308.2.
(A) A PERSON WHO HOLDS A HEMP MANUFACTURING LICENSE:
(1) MAY MANUFACTURE, POSSESS, STORE, AND TRANSPORT
IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT IF THE IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT:
(I) WAS DERIVED EXCLUSIVELY FROM HEMP THAT, AT THE
TIME OF HARVEST OR FIRST LAWFUL TRANSFER INTO MANUFACTURING, MET THE
SPECIFICATIONS OF § 14–101 OF THIS TITLE;
(II) IS BEING HELD BY OR TRANSPORTED BETWEEN LICENSED
HEMP MANUFACTURERS, REGISTERED LABORATORIES, OR OTHER ENTITIES
AUTHORIZED BY REGULATION;
(III) IS CLEARLY LABELED AS “IN PROCESS – NOT FOR RETAIL”;
AND
(IV) REMAINS WITHIN A LICENSED CHAIN OF CUSTODY AND IN
COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE TRACKING REQUIREMENTS; AND
(2) MAY NOT SELL OR DISTRIBUTE FOR RETAIL SALE IN–PROCESS
HEMP EXTRACT.
(B) A PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY DIVERTS IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT INTO
UNLAWFUL COMMERCE IS SUBJECT TO PENALTIES, INCLUDING LICENSE
REVOCATION, PRODUCT SEIZURE, AND CIVIL PENALTIES ESTABLISHED BY
REGULATION.
(C) (1) A HEMP PRODUCT, INCLUDING FULL–SPECTRUM HEMP OIL, MAY
BE OFFERED FOR SALE IN THE STATE ONLY IF THE FINAL PACKAGED PRODUCT:

HOUSE BILL 1631
(I) SATISFIES ALL REQUISITE TESTING REQUIREMENTS;
(II) MEETS COMPLIANCE THRESHOLDS ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(III) COMPLIES WITH ALL LABELING, PACKAGING, AND
MARKETING REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A HEMP PRODUCT THAT EXCEEDS THE TOTAL THC CONTENT
ESTABLISHED FOR RETAIL SALE UNDER THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE DISTRIBUTED ONLY
IN ACCORDANCE WITH DIVISION III OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND
CANNABIS ARTICLE.
14–308.3.
(A) (1) A HEMP MANUFACTURING LICENSE HOLDER SHALL MAINTAIN
CHAIN OF CUSTODY RECORDS THAT ARE SUFFICIENT TO TRACE HEMP AND
HEMP–DERIVED PRODUCTS FROM RECEIPT THROUGH FINAL SALE OR
DESTRUCTION.
(2) CHAIN OF CUSTODY RECORDS MUST INCLUDE THE CERTIFICATE
OF ANALYSIS.
(B) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE LIMITED TESTING OF
IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT FOR CHAIN OF CUSTODY VERIFICATION.
(2) AN IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE IS NOT REQUIRED TO MEET FINAL RETAIL THC THRESHOLDS.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS FOR CHAIN OF
CUSTODY DOCUMENTATION, INCLUDING STANDARDS FOR ELECTRONIC
SEED–TO–SALE TRACKING.
14–308.4.
(A) FINISHED HEMP PRODUCTS SHALL BE TESTED BY AN INDEPENDENT
TESTING LABORATORY.
(B) EACH BATCH OR LOT MUST RECEIVE A CERTIFICATE OF ANALYSIS.
14–308.5.

HOUSE BILL 1631 7
(A) IN ANY CIVIL OR CRIMINAL ACTION ALLEGING THE UNLAWFUL
POSSESSION, MANUFACTURING, OR TRANSPORT OF CANNABIS, IT IS AN
AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE THAT:
(1) THE SUBSTANCE BEING POSSESSED OR TRANSPORTED IS HEMP
OR IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT; AND
(2) THE SUBSTANCE AND POSSESSION, MANUFACTURING, OR
TRANSPORT OF THE SUBSTANCE ARE LICENSED UNDER AND COMPLIES WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A LICENSEE SHALL SUPPORT AN ASSERTION OF THE AFFIRMATIVE
DEFENSE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION BY PRESENTING:
(1) CHAIN OF CUSTODY DOCUMENTATION;
(2) A CERTIFICATE OF ANALYSIS OR WORK ORDER DOCUMENTATION,
AS SPECIFIED BY REGULATION; AND
(3) PROOF OF LICENSURE.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT A PROTOCOL FOR FIELD
VERIFICATION OF LICENSURE AND CHAIN OF CUSTODY WITHOUT SEIZING THE HEMP
OR IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT.
(2) HEMP OR IN–PROCESS HEMP EXTRACT MAY BE SEIZED ONLY IN
EXIGENT CIRCUMSTANCES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2026,
the State Department of Agriculture shall adopt regulations to implement Section 1 of this
Act, including:
(1) licensing categories;
(2) security requirements;
(3) record–keeping requirements;
(4) seed–to–sale tracking policies and procedures;
(5) sampling and testing standards;
(6) packaging and labeling requirements;
(7) transportation manifest requirements;

HOUSE BILL 1631
(8) sanitation requirements; and
(9) enforcement policies and procedures.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.